Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 136. Campgrounds

§ 4410.
Campgrounds; removal.

Definition. A recreational campground or camping park is property where transient residence is offered or provided for seasonal or short-term vacation or recreational purposes on which may be located cabins, tents, or lean-tos, or campsites designed for temporary set-up of portable or mobile camping, recreational, or travel dwelling units, including tents, campers, and recreational vehicles such as motor homes, travel trailers, truck campers, and van campers.

An owner, operator, or agent of a recreational campground or camping park may remove or cause to be removed from a recreational campground or camping park any person who does any of the following:

refuses to pay registration or fees;

violates any municipal or State law; or

violates the published or posted rules of the recreational campground or camping park, which may include a rule that requires campers to respect the peace and quiet enjoyment of other campers and the owner, operator, or agent.

A person who refuses to immediately leave the property after he or she has been told to do so by the owner, operator, or agent shall be in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 3705(a)

and may be prosecuted for unlawful trespass. If any conduct involves the use of a motor vehicle, the person may be prosecuted for any applicable violation of Title 23. For the purposes of this section, the property on which a campground or camping park is located shall be considered open to the free flow and circulation of traffic. The person may be removed from the premises by a law enforcement officer on request of the owner, operator, or agent.

The owner, operator, or agent shall employ reasonable means to protect any personal property left at a campground or camping park by a person who has left or has been removed. A reasonable storage fee that is published or posted may be charged for any personal property left at the campground or camping park. If the owner does not take possession of the personal property within six months of the date the property has been left at the campground, the owner, operator, or agent may dispose of it in a commercially reasonable manner and then pay to the owner the sale proceeds less any storage and sales fees incurred.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2019, No. 48

, § 1.